test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kyever_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - kye´ver: # 2A
    kye´ver+N+Sg+Nom: kye´ver
    kye´ver+N+Sg+Gen: kyeppir
    kye´ver+N+Sg+Acc: kyeppir
    kye´ver+N+Sg+Ill: kye´pirân
    kye´ver+N+Sg+Loc: kye´pirist
    kye´ver+N+Sg+Com: kye´piráin
    kye´ver+N+Sg+Abe: kyeppirttáá
    kye´ver+N+Ess: [kye´pirin, kye´verin]
    kye´ver+N+Par: [kye´pirid, kye´verid]
    kye´ver+N+Pl+Nom: kye´pireh
    kye´ver+N+Pl+Gen: kye´pirij
    kye´ver+N+Pl+Acc: kye´pirijd
    kye´ver+N+Pl+Ill: kye´piráid
    kye´ver+N+Pl+Loc: kye´pirijn
    kye´ver+N+Pl+Com: kye´pirijguin
    kye´ver+N+Pl+Abe: kye´pirijttáá
